District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-301.10

Redevelopment companies.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 798, ch. 736, § 11
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1104, Pub. L. 85-854, § 1(13)
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-810.
1973 Ed., § 5-710.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).